Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1707
Massage therapy establishment, defined.

Massage therapy establishment means any duly licensed place in which a massage therapist practices his or her profession of massage therapy. Massage therapy establishment includes a mobile massage therapy establishment.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 614;

Laws 2019, LB244, § 3.